Louisiana, session 2026, HB1159.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:43(A)(4) and 46(C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§43. Automated speed enforcement devices; prohibition
A.
* * *
(4)(a) The provisions contained in this Section shall not apply to a governing
authority of a municipality with a population of less than sixteen thousand and more
than fifteen thousand according to the latest federal decennial census within a parish
with a population of less than ninety thousand and more than seventy thousand
according to the latest federal decennial census.
(b) The provisions contained in this Section shall not apply to a parish,
including its municipalities, with a population of not less than four hundred thirty-
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2051 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1159
nine thousand and not more than four hundred forty-two thousand according to the
latest federal decennial census.
* * *
§46. Electronic enforcement devices; school zone restrictions
* * *
C.(1) The provisions contained in this Section shall not apply to a governing
authority of a municipality with a population of less than sixteen thousand and more
than fifteen thousand according to the latest federal decennial census within a parish
with a population of less than ninety thousand and more than seventy thousand
according to the latest federal decennial census.
(2) The provisions contained in this Section shall not apply to a parish,
including its municipalities, with a population of not less than four hundred thirty-
nine thousand and not more than four hundred forty-two thousand according to the
latest federal decennial census.
* * *